District of Columbia statutes.
3-1208.53

Advanced practice addiction counselor.

The Board of Professional Counseling shall license as an advanced practice addiction counselor a person who, in addition to meeting the requirements of subchapter V of this chapter [§ 3-1205 et seq.]:

(1)

Has met the educational requirements of graduating with at least a master’s or doctorate degree in health or human services from an accredited institution that incorporates the academic course work and minimum hours of supervised training adopted by the Board and whose program is accredited by an agency recognized by the U.S. Department of Education; and

(2)

Passed a national examination approved by the Board.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 853
as added July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-13, § 2(e), 56 DCR 3608